Georgia statutes. TITLE 7 Banking And Finance
Article 3 Credit Unions

Cross references.

Credit Union Deposit Insurance Corporation, T. 7, C. 2.

Exemption from securities-registration provisions of securities issued by or guaranteed by credit union, § 10-5-8.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Credit unions generally, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Rules of Department of Banking and Finance, Banks, Chapter 80-2-1 et seq.

Law reviews.

For article, “Small Loans Under Georgia Laws,” see 3 Mercer L. Rev. 227 (1952).